apertium-ckb.ckb.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Sorani Kurdish

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <pr>     # Preposition
# <conjcoo> # Coordinating Conjunction

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Noun subcategories
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular
# <ind>    # Indefinite
# <def>    # Definite

# Verb subcategories
# <iv>     # Intransitive
# <tv>     # Transitive
# <past>   # Past
# <npast>  # Non-past
# <imp>    # Imperative
# <neg>    # Negative

# Person tags
# <p1>     # First person
# <p2>     # Second person
# <p3>     # Third person

# Cases
# <subj>   # Subject
# <obj>    # Object

# Adjective tags
# <comp>   # Comparative
# <sup>    # Superlative

# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Nouns
Verbs
Pronouns
Adverbs
Adjectives
Prepositions
Conjunctions
Determiners
Numerals
Interjections
Punctuation
Numbers

PATTERN Nouns
N-Stems [ <n>: ] Definite/Plural Izafa? Izafa? Conj?
N-Stems [ <n>: ] Definite/Plural Izafa? Izafa? Conj? [ +<pr>: ] Prep
N-Stems [ <n>: ] Definite/Plural [ +: ] Subject_Prn(3) Izafa?
N-Stems_Locations [ <np><top>: ] Izafa? Conj?
N-Stems_Proper [ <np>: ] Izafa?
N-Stems_Names [ <np><ant>: ] Izafa?
N-Stems_Locations [ <np><top>: ] [ +: ] Subject_Prn(3) Izafa?
Izafa

PATTERN Verbs
Verbs_Inf Izafa?
V-Stems_1
V-Stems_1 Subject_Prn(1) Izafa?
[ :نە> ] V-Stems_1 [ <neg>: ] Subject_Prn(1)
[ :نە> ] Subject_Prn(1) V-Stems_1 [ <neg>: ]
NPast(1) V-Stems_2 NPast(2) Subject_Prn(2)
:Imperatives(1) V-Stems_2 Imperatives(2) Izafa?
:Subjunctives(1) V-Stems_2 Subjunctives(2)

V-Stems_1 Subject_Prn(1) [ <pp>:ووە ]
V-Stems_1 Subject_Prn(1) [ :ەوە ]
[ :نە> ] V-Stems_1 [ <neg>: ] Subject_Prn(1) [ <pp>:ووە ]

PATTERN Pronouns
Prns [ +: ] Subject_Prn(3)?
Prns Izafa?

PATTERN Adjectives
Adj-Stem [ <adj>: ] Comparatives? Definite/Plural? Izafa?
Adj-Stem [ <adj>: ] Comparatives? Definite/Plural? [ +: ] Subject_Prn(3) Izafa?
Prep [ <pr>+: ] Adj-Stem [ <adj>: ] Comparatives? Definite/Plural? [ یش<pr>:>{I}ش ]? [ +: ] Subject_Prn(3) Izafa?
Ordinals [ <adj>: ] Izafa?

PATTERN Prepositions
Prep [ <pr>: ] Prep?
Prep [ <pr>+: ] Izafa?
Prep [ <pr>+: ] Num? Izafa?
Prep Nouns Izafa?

PATTERN Conjunctions
Conj [ <conjcoo>: ]

PATTERN Adverbs
Advrb [ <adv>: ]

PATTERN Determiners
Dets Izafa?

PATTERN Numerals
Num+ [ <num>: ] Izafa?

PATTERN Interjections
Int [ <ij>: ] Izafa?

PATTERN Punctuation
Punctuations+

PATTERN Numbers
Nums+ [ <num>: ] Izafa?
Nums+ ([.]|[،]) Num+ [<num>:] Izafa?

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON N-Stems
